Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.052

Five-year formal review process of existing rules.

The department of labor and industries must establish and perform, within existing funds, a formal review process of its existing rules every five years. The goal of the review is to decrease the numbers of, simplify the process, and decrease the time required for obtaining licenses, permits, and inspections, as applicable, in order to reduce the regulatory burden on businesses without compromising public health and safety. Benchmarks must be adopted to assess the effectiveness of streamlining efforts. The department must establish a process for effectively applying sunset provisions to rules when applicable. The department must report back to the applicable committees of the legislature with its review process and benchmarks by January 2014.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 30 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2013 2nd sp.s. c 30: See note following RCW 43.21A.081.